Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1,140
Consultation with
licensed veterinarian; conduct authorized.

Any person who holds a valid credential in the State of Nebraska
in a health care profession or occupation regulated under the Uniform Credentialing
Act may consult with a licensed veterinarian or perform collaborative animal health care tasks
on an animal under the care of such veterinarian if all such
tasks are performed under the immediate supervision of such veterinarian.
Engaging in such conduct is hereby authorized and shall not be considered
a part of the credential holder's scope of practice or a violation of the
credential holder's scope of practice.

Laws 2008, LB928, § 3;

Laws 2009, LB463, § 1.